Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.300

Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the principal and superintendent and program administrator internship support programs.

[ 1993 c 336 s 407.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—1993 c 336: See notes following RCW 28A.150.210.

Findings—1993 c 336: See note following RCW 28A.150.210.